Louisiana, session 2026, SB32.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The heading of Part XII-A of Chapter 5-B of Title 40 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1124.3 is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
PART XII-A. PERINATAL PHYSICAL HEALTH POLICY
* * *
§1124.3. Perinatal bereavement care
A. There is hereby established within the Louisiana Department of
Health, office on women's health and community health, the Perinatal
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 32 ENROLLED
Bereavement Care Initiative. The department shall administer the initiative to
improve access to and the quality of perinatal bereavement care in the state.
B. The office shall coordinate with the Commission on Perinatal Care
and Prevention of Infant Mortality and nonprofit organizations to provide all
of the following resources to hospitals with a maternity unit or neonatal
intensive care unit:
(1) Training for hospital personnel on interacting with parents and
family members following an intrauterine fetal demise, neonatal death, or
stillbirth.
(2)(a) A perinatal cooling device that is available to any family that
experiences an intrauterine fetal demise, neonatal death, stillbirth, or infant
death at the hospital.
(b) Education for staff on use of a perinatal cooling device. Any nursing
staff using a perinatal cooling device shall either receive training on use of the
device or complete a perinatal bereavement certificate program.
(3) Assistance identifying available perinatal bereavement services for
parents and family members, including grief counseling and support groups.
C.(1) The office shall identify each hospital that has a maternity unit or
neonatal intensive care unit.
(2) The office shall prioritize hospitals that lack access to a perinatal
cooling device, treat a high number of high-risk maternal patients, and deliver
a high number of babies.
D. The department may seek and receive voluntary monies from any
sources, including federal funds, gifts, grants, and donations, which shall be
expended for the purposes provided for in this Section.
E. Beginning February 1, 2027, through February 1, 2030, the Louisiana
Department of Health shall submit an annual report to the Senate Health and
Welfare Committee and the House Health and Welfare Committee on the
progress of the initiative. The report shall include a list of the hospitals that
meet the criteria for the initiative, the hospitals that have participated, funding
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 32 ENROLLED
received and utilized for the initiative, the number of perinatal cooling devices
distributed, and training completed by the appropriate hospital staff.
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as "Angel's Law".
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.